Washington statutes.
RCW 43.180.290

Beginning farmer financing program.

(1) The commission may develop and implement a program to provide financing for beginning farmers. In developing the program, the commission shall establish eligibility criteria for financing that will enable it to choose applicants who are likely to repay loans made or acquired by the commission and funded from the proceeds of commission bonds.

(2) The commission may:

(a) Issue revenue bonds as defined in RCW 43.180.020(1) for the purpose of financing loans to beginning farmers in accordance with RCW 43.180.150;

(b) Do all things necessary to provide for the exemption of interest on its bonds from federal income taxation; and

(c) Participate fully in federal and other governmental programs and take such actions as are necessary and consistent with this chapter to secure to itself and the people of the state the benefits of those programs for beginning farmers.

[ 2005 c 120 s 2.]

NOTES:

Findings—Purpose—2005 c 120: "The legislature finds that there are a significant number of people from both urban and rural areas of the state with the training, expertise, and interest in initiating a livelihood in farming but who lack the financial resources to get started. The legislature also finds that the average age of existing farmers is increasing, the number of full-time commercial farms is decreasing, and an increasing concern that there will be insufficient young people who have both the capability and interest to fulfill the needs for the next generation.

The legislature finds that there are a significant number of new small farms in the state and a significant enrollment in agricultural courses offered by public community colleges and universities and the beginning farmer program offered by Washington State University cooperative extension.

The purpose of this act is to establish a program to test the feasibility, interest, and results of a beginning farmer loan program." [ 2005 c 120 s 1.]